District of Columbia statutes.
29-106.01

Grounds.

The Mayor may commence a proceeding under § 29-106.02 to dissolve a domestic filing entity administratively if the entity does not:

(1)

Pay any fee or penalty required to be paid to the Mayor not later than 5 months after it is due;

(2)

Deliver a biennial report to the Mayor not later than 5 months after it is due; or

(3)

Have a registered agent in the District for 60 days.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
Mar. 5, 2013, D.C. Law 19-210, § 2(a)(39), 59 DCR 13171
Application of Law 19-210: Section 7 of D.C. Law 19-210 provided that the act shall apply as of January 1, 2012.
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-210 deleted “tax”’ following “fee” in (a); and substituted “5 months” for “6 months” in (b).
This section is referenced in § 29-106.02, § 29-610.01, and § 29-1208.01.